Illinois, session 104th, SB3712.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $1,760,144, or so much of that 5amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 6Revenue Fund to the Illinois Department of Human Services' 7Office of Firearm Violence Prevention for a grant to the Lake 8County State's Attorney's Office for a violence interrupter 9program, including administrative and operating costs. 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 112026.